Utah statutes.
47-3-305.   Exceptions and prohibitions.

(1)  This part does not apply to:

(a)  shooting ranges that are otherwise open to the public;

(b)  shooting ranges that are operated as a public shooting range staffed by and operated by Division of Wildlife Resources;

(c)  the Utah National Guard ranges located at Camp Williams and the Salt Lake International Airport; and

(d)  ranges owned, operated, or currently leased as of March 26, 2013, by a state or local public safety agency.

(2)  Firearms may not be allowed in a school building, except under the provision of Section 76-10-505.5, unless there is an outdoor entrance to the shooting range and the most direct access to the range is used.  An outdoor entrance to a shooting range may not be blocked by fences, structures, or gates for the purpose of blocking the outdoor entrance.

(3)  Only air guns may be used in public ranges where the ventilation systems do not meet current OSHA standards as applied to the duration of exposure of the participants.  For the purposes of this part, an air gun does not include larger caliber pneumatic weapons, paintball guns, or air shotguns.

(4)  Group range use is a lawful, approved activity under Subsection 76-10-505.5(4)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

